Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1201.03
Director of
Economic Development; appointment; duties; personnel.

The
chief executive officer of the department shall be the Director of Economic
Development who shall be appointed by the Governor with the consent of a majority
of the Legislature. The director shall administer the affairs of the department
and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The director shall have equal
rank with the heads of other state departments, and his or her salary shall
be fixed by the Governor. The
director shall employ a deputy director with significant and extensive professional
experience in the field of economic development. The director shall employ
division directors and such other assistants, professional staff, and other
employees as he or she deems necessary to effectively carry out sections 81-1201.01
to 81-1201.20 within the appropriations the Legislature provides.

Laws 1986, LB 965, § 3;

Laws 2013, LB78, § 12.